Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB610.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Enrolled Dependents Right to Confidentiality for Health Care Services Received.--(a) A health insurance policy or government program that is offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall include policies and procedures that comply with Federal and State law to ensure that all 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 identifiable information regarding receipt of health care services by a protected enrolled dependent is adequately protected and remains confidential.(b) A health insurer shall develop a standardized confidential communications request form, in an easily readable and understandable format as approved by the department, to permit a protected enrolled dependent to request an alternative method for receiving confidential communication related to the receipt of health care services, according to the following:(1) A health insurer shall permit any protected enrolled dependent to submit a confidential communications request.(2) A request by a protected enrolled dependent exercising the option for confidential communication shall be submitted in writing using the standardized form.(3) The availability of the standardized form shall be disseminated in a health insurance policy or government program.(c) Confidential communications subject to the requirements of this section include the following:(1) explanation of benefits;(2) information related to an appointment for health care services;(3) a claim denial;(4) a request for additional information related to a claim;(5) a notice of a contested claim;(6) the name and address of a provider, a description of services provided and other visit information; and(7) any written, oral or electronic communication from a carrier that contains protected health information.(d) Alternative methods of receiving confidential communication shall include:20250SB0610PN0616 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) sending a paper form to an alternate address as requested by the protected enrolled dependent;(2) sending electronic communication to an alternate electronic address as requested by the protected enrolled dependent; or(3) withholding confidential communication as requested by the protected enrolled dependent until an alternative method of receiving communication is requested subsequently at a later date by the protected enrolled dependent. A protected enrolled dependent shall be permitted to submit a subsequent request orally in-person or by telephone, or by paper or electronic written communication.(e) In the event that a protected enrolled dependent has no liability for payment for a procedure or service, a health insurance policy or government program shall permit a protected enrolled dependent to request suppression of all confidential communications, in which case the explanation of benefits, or any confidential communication covered under this section, shall not be issued.(f) A health insurer or government program shall ensure that requests for confidential communication required under subsection (b) are implemented not later than three business days after receipt of a request. A health insurer shall acknowledge receipt of a protected enrolled dependent's confidential communications request form by providing notice to the protected enrolled dependent through the alternative method of communication as requested by the protected enrolled dependent.(g) The department, in collaboration with the Department of Health, may develop and implement a plan to educate health care 20250SB0610PN0616 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providers and consumers regarding the rights of protected enrolled dependents and the responsibilities of health insurers to promote compliance with this section, according to the following:(1) The plan shall include staff training and other education for:(i) All administrative staff involved in patient registration and confidentiality education.(ii) All billing staff involved in processing insurance claims.(iii) Education for health care providers employed in a health care facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the "Health Care Facilities Act."(iv) Education for health care providers employed in school health services as provided under Article XIV of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the "Public School Code of 1949."(2) The plan shall include instruction for health care providers to disseminate a protected enrolled dependent's right to exercise the alternative delivery of confidential communications in a manner that clearly displays its availability to patients.(h) The department may promulgate regulations necessary to implement and enforce this section, which may include requirements for reasonable reporting by a health insurer that issues, delivers, executes or renews a policy covered under this section to the department regarding compliance and the number and type of complaints received regarding noncompliance with this section.20250SB0610PN0616 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The department shall submit an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives, which shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, to disseminate the following information:(1) Aggregate data for health insurer reporting requirements as established under subsection (h).(2) The effectiveness of the requirements established under this section in enabling protected enrolled dependents to request an alternative method for receiving confidential communications.(3) Education and outreach conducted by health insurers and providers to inform protected enrolled dependents about the protected enrolled dependent's right to request an alternative method for receiving confidential communication related to the receipt of health care services.(j) The department shall implement an appeals process for the denial or partial denial by a health insurer of a claim provided to a protected enrolled dependent who has exercised the right to an alternative method for receiving confidential communications covered by this section, according to the following:(1) A protected enrolled dependent has the right to appeal a denial or partial denial of a claim.(2) An enrollee, subscriber or certificate holder is prohibited from appealing a denial or partial denial of a claim unless the protected enrolled dependent has provided written authorization to disclose claims information relevant to the 20250SB0610PN0616 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appeal.(k) This section shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy or government program for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the department, this section shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first permitted to be used on or after 180 days after the effective date of this subsection.(2) For a health insurance policy or government program for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the department, this section shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this subsection.(l) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Government program." The following:(1) Subarticle (f) of Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(2) The Commonwealth's children's health insurance program under Article XXIII-A."Health care practitioner." An individual who is authorized to practice some component of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate or registration issued by a Commonwealth licensing agency or board."Health care provider." Any of the following:(1) A health care practitioner as defined in section 103 of the "Health Care Facilities Act."(2) A federally qualified health center as defined in 42 20250SB0610PN0616 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(4) (relating to definitions).(3) A rural health clinic as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(2).(4) A pharmacist who holds a valid license under the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the "Pharmacy Act."(5) A social worker, clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist or professional counselor who holds a valid license under the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the "Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."(6) A registered professional nurse who holds a valid license under the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as "The Professional Nursing Law.""Health insurance policy." The following:(1) An individual or group health insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage for services provided by a health care facility or licensed health care provider on an expense-incurred service or prepaid basis and that is offered by or is governed under any of the following:(i) This act, including section 630.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Chs. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) and 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include the following policies:(i) Accident only.(ii) Credit only.20250SB0610PN0616 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Long-term care or disability income.(iv) Specified disease.(v) Medicare supplement.(vi) TRICARE , including Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement.(vii) Fixed indemnity.(viii) Dental only.(ix) Vision only.(x) Workers' compensation.(xi) Automobile medical payment insurance under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles)."Health insurer." An entity offering a health insurance policy or government program."Protected enrolled dependent." The following:(1) An adult covered as a dependent on a health insurance policy.(2) A minor authorized to consent to medical, dental and health services under State law that is covered as a dependent on a policyholder's insurance policy."Protected health information." As defined in Federal regulation under 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions) promulgated under the administrative simplification provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0610PN0616 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425